Washington statutes.
RCW 7.06.047

Discovery.

After the assignment of a case to the arbitrator, a party may conduct discovery as follows: (1) Request from the arbitrator an examination under CR 35; (2) request admissions from a party under CR 36; and (3) take the deposition of another party. A party may request additional discovery from the arbitrator, including interrogatories, and the arbitrator will allow additional discovery only as reasonably necessary.

[ 2018 c 36 s 4.]

NOTES:

Applicability—Effective date—2018 c 36: See notes following RCW 7.06.043.